Hawaii statutes.
§223-3 Diversification of economic
development and population growth. The office of planning shall develop a
strategic plan as part of its quality growth policy. The plan shall develop
recommendations on dispersing economic development and population growth to
prevent overpopulation or overdevelopment of any one county within the State.
[L 1993, c 213, §1; am L 1996, c 299, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next